Florida, session 2026, SB1330.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 47 48 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âDisability 49 Awareness and Inclusion Education Act.â 50 Section 2.âSection 1003.4299, Florida Statutes, is created 51 to read: 52 1003.4299âDisability Awareness and Inclusion Education 53 Program.â 54 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âIt is the intent of the Legislature 55 to promote empathy, acceptance, and inclusion among all students 56 by integrating disability awareness education in this stateâs K 57 12 public school curriculum. The Legislature finds that early 58 education about disabilities fosters compassion, reduces stigma, 59 and contributes to positive school climates. 60 (2)âPROGRAM CREATION AND GOALS.â 61 (a)âThe Department of Education may create the Disability 62 Awareness and Inclusion Education Program. 63 (b)âThe Disability Awareness and Inclusion Education 64 Program shall: 65 1.âIncrease awareness of visible and invisible 66 disabilities; 67 2.âPromote empathy through storytelling, simulations, and 68 interactive learning; 69 3.âEncourage inclusion by reducing stigma and fostering 70 friendship and belonging; and 71 4.âInspire student advocacy and leadership to support peers 72 with disabilities. 73 (3)âCURRICULUM FRAMEWORK.â 74 (a)âThe department, in consultation with disability 75 advocates, educators, and subject-matter experts, may develop 76 and make available age-appropriate curriculum standards and 77 instructional materials for implementation in kindergarten 78 through grade 12. 79 (b)âInstruction may include: 80 1.âFor kindergarten through grade 5, at least one lesson 81 per month emphasizing kindness, empathy, and understanding of 82 disabilities through stories and simple activities. 83 2.âFor grades 6 through 8, at least two lessons per month 84 incorporating hands-on activities, such as simulations, as well 85 as group projects and lessons on accessibility and disability 86 history. 87 3.âFor grades 9 through 12, a 4- to 6-week annual program 88 addressing disability rights, advocacy, media representation, 89 and community service projects. 90 (4)âIMPLEMENTATION AND TRAINING.â 91 (a)âThe program may be implemented in three phases: 92 1.âPhase 1 may include pilot implementation in selected 93 schools for one year. 94 2.âPhase 2 may begin the second year of the program and 95 shall include districtwide expansion. 96 3.âPhase 3 may begin the fourth year of the program and 97 include statewide expansion. 98 (b)âThe department may provide guidance and professional 99 development opportunities for teachers and parents involved in 100 supporting disability awareness education. 101 (c)âTraining sessions may be conducted at least twice per 102 year, either in person or virtually, and may include: 103 1.âEvidence-based strategies to promote inclusion, empathy, 104 and understanding of disabilities; 105 2.âTools to support students with disabilities in academic 106 and social settings; and 107 3.âMethods to enhance homeâschool collaboration and 108 reinforce inclusive practices across environments. 109 (5)âCOLLABORATION.âThe department may collaborate with 110 disability advocacy organizations, parent training and 111 information centers, and universities with expertise in 112 inclusive education to develop, implement, and evaluate 113 curriculum and training materials. 114 (6)âFUNDING.âSubject to legislative appropriation, the 115 department may award grants to school districts to support 116 implementation of this program, including the development of 117 instructional materials and professional development activities. 118 (7)âIMPLEMENTATION TIMELINE.âThe department may establish 119 program guidelines and make them available to school districts 120 no later than January 1, 2027. 121 (8)âPROGRAM EVALUATION.âParticipating schools may collect 122 and report data to the department on student empathy surveys, 123 teacher and parent observations, and indicators of school 124 climate, including measures of inclusion and bullying. The 125 department may use this information to guide program improvement 126 and statewide rollout. 127 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.